test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON V69	
+V69:wqit	Modes ;
+V69:wwho	Modes ;
+V69:wziy	Modes ;
+V69:wnfä	Modes ;
+V69:wfen	Modes ;
+V69:woam	Modes ;
+V69:wmzo	Modes ;
+V69:wcöa	Modes ;
+V69:wmmo	Modes ;
+V69:wick	Modes ;
+V69:wålö	Modes ;
+V69:wjit	Modes ;
+V69:wzjg	Modes ;
+V69:wztp	Modes ;
+V69:wjqä	Modes ;
+V69:wbzc	Modes ;
+V69:wkst	Modes ;
+V69:wrei	Modes ;
+V69:wtnz	Modes ;
+V69:wveu	Modes ;
+V69:wxab	Modes ;
+V69:wpht	Modes ;
+V69:waew	Modes ;
+V69:wnyå	Modes ;
+V69:wonn	Modes ;
+V69:wpwh	Modes ;
+V69:wchc	Modes ;
+V69:wmfw	Modes ;
+V69:wwis	Modes ;
+V69:wnyd	Modes ;
+V69:wötg	Modes ;
+V69:wtcy	Modes ;
+V69:wkir	Modes ;
+V69:wigå	Modes ;
+V69:wuaä	Modes ;
+V69:wjnc	Modes ;
+V69:wäay	Modes ;
+V69:wiås	Modes ;
+V69:wtho	Modes ;
+V69:wåuu	Modes ;
+V69:wert	Modes ;
+V69:wyox	Modes ;
+V69:woes	Modes ;
+V69:wpwg	Modes ;
+V69:wåöw	Modes ;
+V69:wäöe	Modes ;
+V69:wnai	Modes ;
+V69:wzpy	Modes ;
+V69:wzeå	Modes ;
+V69:wnnc	Modes ;
+V69:wklt	Modes ;
+V69:wnbe	Modes ;
+V69:wipk	Modes ;
+V69:wsin	Modes ;
+V69:wvbl	Modes ;
+V69:wknd	Modes ;
+V69:wwft	Modes ;
+V69:wfea	Modes ;
+V69:wbwr	Modes ;
+V69:wqåf	Modes ;
+V69:wfrj	Modes ;
+V69:wäjä	Modes ;
+V69:wghö	Modes ;
+V69:wakz	Modes ;
+V69:wphf	Modes ;
+V69:wtyb	Modes ;
+V69:wnmm	Modes ;
+V69:wchg	Modes ;
+V69:wfsj	Modes ;
+V69:wiöv	Modes ;
+V69:wgjf	Modes ;
+V69:wzwl	Modes ;
+V69:wöda	Modes ;
+V69:wåzä	Modes ;
+V69:wtpj	Modes ;
+V69:wxrl	Modes ;
+V69:wdbi	Modes ;
+V69:wöon	Modes ;
+V69:wnwa	Modes ;
+V69:wssl	Modes ;
+V69:wrte	Modes ;
+V69:wdqd	Modes ;
+V69:wdop	Modes ;
+V69:wiok	Modes ;
+V69:wätk	Modes ;
+V69:wooa	Modes ;
+V69:wnql	Modes ;
+V69:wsoe	Modes ;
+V69:wseu	Modes ;
+V69:wjmq	Modes ;
+V69:wzct	Modes ;
+V69:wbjå	Modes ;
+V69:wtxo	Modes ;
+V69:wåjj	Modes ;
+V69:whtz	Modes ;
+V69:wqeu	Modes ;
+V69:wökg	Modes ;
+V69:wnrå	Modes ;
+V69:wxlm	Modes ;


LEXICON V70	
+V7%0:xwjq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xåpy	Modes ;
+V7%0:xyif	Modes ;
+V7%0:xtxq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xdia	Modes ;
+V7%0:xfea	Modes ;
+V7%0:xhet	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcje	Modes ;
+V7%0:xroj	Modes ;
+V7%0:xyäa	Modes ;
+V7%0:xåzt	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcjt	Modes ;
+V7%0:xicw	Modes ;
+V7%0:xvsb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xqkä	Modes ;
+V7%0:xccx	Modes ;
+V7%0:xlcr	Modes ;
+V7%0:xkfb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xxtu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xghl	Modes ;
+V7%0:xzjä	Modes ;
+V7%0:xwfm	Modes ;
+V7%0:xvgu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xbqn	Modes ;
+V7%0:xbuu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xiyw	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcjn	Modes ;
+V7%0:xoåt	Modes ;
+V7%0:xfyä	Modes ;
+V7%0:xryp	Modes ;
+V7%0:xqto	Modes ;
+V7%0:xnea	Modes ;
+V7%0:xåhu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xyxz	Modes ;
+V7%0:xetq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcwu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xtöö	Modes ;
+V7%0:xjöm	Modes ;
+V7%0:xxeg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xtfu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xmeå	Modes ;
+V7%0:xöäy	Modes ;
+V7%0:xteg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xvvg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xomä	Modes ;
+V7%0:xedb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xdaq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xfbm	Modes ;
+V7%0:xhsq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xxje	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcgå	Modes ;
+V7%0:xjug	Modes ;
+V7%0:xjnö	Modes ;
+V7%0:xågp	Modes ;
+V7%0:xzgu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xamw	Modes ;
+V7%0:xidg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xggi	Modes ;
+V7%0:xxqp	Modes ;
+V7%0:xswh	Modes ;
+V7%0:xzdo	Modes ;
+V7%0:xhfb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xyyt	Modes ;
+V7%0:xobq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xjdx	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcxa	Modes ;
+V7%0:xkhc	Modes ;
+V7%0:xcom	Modes ;
+V7%0:xötq	Modes ;
+V7%0:xnök	Modes ;
+V7%0:xfmy	Modes ;
+V7%0:xkud	Modes ;
+V7%0:xwtr	Modes ;
+V7%0:xzwo	Modes ;
+V7%0:xqwm	Modes ;
+V7%0:xknä	Modes ;
+V7%0:xkpt	Modes ;
+V7%0:xnwd	Modes ;
+V7%0:xkip	Modes ;
+V7%0:xckå	Modes ;
+V7%0:xowp	Modes ;
+V7%0:xörg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xlrr	Modes ;
+V7%0:xglu	Modes ;
+V7%0:xzaj	Modes ;
+V7%0:xnvg	Modes ;
+V7%0:xrig	Modes ;
+V7%0:xhdv	Modes ;
+V7%0:xtbz	Modes ;
+V7%0:xutb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xopn	Modes ;
+V7%0:xrqb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xekn	Modes ;
+V7%0:xiöc	Modes ;
+V7%0:xaäb	Modes ;
+V7%0:xeåy	Modes ;
+V7%0:xiqö	Modes ;
+V7%0:xxfs	Modes ;
+V7%0:xuen	Modes ;


LEXICON V71	
+V71:ytsl	Modes ;
+V71:yåve	Modes ;
+V71:yxtd	Modes ;
+V71:yyår	Modes ;
+V71:yyrn	Modes ;
+V71:yqnå	Modes ;
+V71:yzif	Modes ;
+V71:ypjs	Modes ;
+V71:yvqh	Modes ;
+V71:yjhm	Modes ;
+V71:yäqd	Modes ;
+V71:ybtw	Modes ;
+V71:ycmx	Modes ;
+V71:ymxå	Modes ;
+V71:yvoä	Modes ;
+V71:ysgi	Modes ;
+V71:ysmy	Modes ;
+V71:yåoh	Modes ;
+V71:ymöv	Modes ;
+V71:ypff	Modes ;
+V71:ykjä	Modes ;
+V71:ywly	Modes ;
+V71:yötx	Modes ;
+V71:yciq	Modes ;
+V71:ycui	Modes ;
+V71:ymhv	Modes ;
+V71:ygss	Modes ;
+V71:ylhk	Modes ;
+V71:yome	Modes ;
+V71:yiab	Modes ;
+V71:ybdå	Modes ;
+V71:yqci	Modes ;
+V71:yäuk	Modes ;
+V71:yfsd	Modes ;
+V71:yykq	Modes ;
+V71:yruö	Modes ;
+V71:ypöp	Modes ;
+V71:yytc	Modes ;
+V71:yeäc	Modes ;
+V71:ywik	Modes ;
+V71:ytää	Modes ;
+V71:yrbb	Modes ;
+V71:yfqr	Modes ;
+V71:ybtx	Modes ;
+V71:yved	Modes ;
+V71:ywic	Modes ;
+V71:yfjs	Modes ;
+V71:ypqy	Modes ;
+V71:ykgy	Modes ;
+V71:yäsp	Modes ;
+V71:ywäs	Modes ;
+V71:yråx	Modes ;
+V71:yclr	Modes ;
+V71:yiur	Modes ;
+V71:ydäo	Modes ;
+V71:yqhz	Modes ;
+V71:yrid	Modes ;
+V71:yhxt	Modes ;
+V71:ywff	Modes ;
+V71:ykmt	Modes ;
+V71:yijw	Modes ;
+V71:ydeg	Modes ;
+V71:ywsm	Modes ;
+V71:yhåz	Modes ;
+V71:yfku	Modes ;
+V71:yhdd	Modes ;
+V71:yphä	Modes ;
+V71:yäåx	Modes ;
+V71:yoar	Modes ;
+V71:yfme	Modes ;
+V71:yyey	Modes ;
+V71:yaur	Modes ;
+V71:yoäd	Modes ;
+V71:ytry	Modes ;
+V71:yblj	Modes ;
+V71:ylwd	Modes ;
+V71:yaåd	Modes ;
+V71:ypäw	Modes ;
+V71:ylps	Modes ;
+V71:yrnc	Modes ;
+V71:ygöf	Modes ;
+V71:yigg	Modes ;
+V71:ybcb	Modes ;
+V71:ymnu	Modes ;
+V71:yyky	Modes ;
+V71:ybzk	Modes ;
+V71:yåei	Modes ;
+V71:yhla	Modes ;
+V71:yåso	Modes ;
+V71:ynhe	Modes ;
+V71:yoee	Modes ;
+V71:yyås	Modes ;
+V71:yuki	Modes ;
+V71:yhcu	Modes ;
+V71:yokv	Modes ;
+V71:ywbr	Modes ;
+V71:yjhd	Modes ;
+V71:ypgb	Modes ;
+V71:ytku	Modes ;


LEXICON V72	
+V72:zokc	Modes ;
+V72:zfre	Modes ;
+V72:zbnb	Modes ;
+V72:zyzy	Modes ;
+V72:zxsp	Modes ;
+V72:zölc	Modes ;
+V72:zsvf	Modes ;
+V72:zölq	Modes ;
+V72:zbvå	Modes ;
+V72:zöfr	Modes ;
+V72:zötf	Modes ;
+V72:zöjä	Modes ;
+V72:zkwa	Modes ;
+V72:ztwr	Modes ;
+V72:zgms	Modes ;
+V72:zaöm	Modes ;
+V72:zhcz	Modes ;
+V72:zsäx	Modes ;
+V72:ztwy	Modes ;
+V72:zzkm	Modes ;
+V72:zhsä	Modes ;
+V72:zöåa	Modes ;
+V72:ztsq	Modes ;
+V72:zhdk	Modes ;
+V72:zuqg	Modes ;
+V72:zmkj	Modes ;
+V72:zopd	Modes ;
+V72:zptl	Modes ;
+V72:zliq	Modes ;
+V72:zvgk	Modes ;
+V72:zmtr	Modes ;
+V72:zzwa	Modes ;
+V72:zufg	Modes ;
+V72:zxgu	Modes ;
+V72:zcäm	Modes ;
+V72:zjbp	Modes ;
+V72:zåcj	Modes ;
+V72:zyik	Modes ;
+V72:zfde	Modes ;
+V72:zcgy	Modes ;
+V72:zjex	Modes ;
+V72:znvy	Modes ;
+V72:zool	Modes ;
+V72:zblx	Modes ;
+V72:zdsb	Modes ;
+V72:zgxf	Modes ;
+V72:zqeo	Modes ;
+V72:zånd	Modes ;
+V72:zhsk	Modes ;
+V72:zjos	Modes ;
+V72:zeza	Modes ;
+V72:zmkn	Modes ;
+V72:zpbi	Modes ;
+V72:ziei	Modes ;
+V72:zlåp	Modes ;
+V72:zlln	Modes ;
+V72:zbbu	Modes ;
+V72:zeek	Modes ;
+V72:zoåk	Modes ;
+V72:zqho	Modes ;
+V72:zopu	Modes ;
+V72:zkda	Modes ;
+V72:zozv	Modes ;
+V72:zlar	Modes ;
+V72:zzko	Modes ;
+V72:zqjj	Modes ;
+V72:zmkn	Modes ;
+V72:zgps	Modes ;
+V72:ziöt	Modes ;
+V72:zktd	Modes ;
+V72:zaxc	Modes ;
+V72:ztnx	Modes ;
+V72:zljp	Modes ;
+V72:zste	Modes ;
+V72:zdje	Modes ;
+V72:zzae	Modes ;
+V72:zrjk	Modes ;
+V72:zjjb	Modes ;
+V72:zåed	Modes ;
+V72:zöyx	Modes ;
+V72:zhrh	Modes ;
+V72:ziyu	Modes ;
+V72:zads	Modes ;
+V72:zyke	Modes ;
+V72:zntw	Modes ;
+V72:zodf	Modes ;
+V72:zmkt	Modes ;
+V72:zäoh	Modes ;
+V72:zjlt	Modes ;
+V72:zetö	Modes ;
+V72:zutd	Modes ;
+V72:zlij	Modes ;
+V72:zvph	Modes ;
+V72:zvwf	Modes ;
+V72:zbfz	Modes ;
+V72:zpws	Modes ;
+V72:zdxk	Modes ;
+V72:zåxx	Modes ;
+V72:zhts	Modes ;

LEXICON Root
l V69 ;
m V70 ;
n V71 ;
o V72 ;
